Indiana, session 2026, HB1056.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-44.1-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 19, AND AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025, SECTION 88,
IS CORRECTED AND AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) A person who knowingly
or intentionally:
(1) forcibly resists, obstructs, or interferes with a law enforcement
officer or a person assisting the officer while the officer is
lawfully engaged in the execution of the officer's duties;
(2) forcibly resists, obstructs, or interferes with the authorized
service or execution of a civil or criminal process or order of a
court; or
(3) flees from a law enforcement officer after the officer has, by
visible or audible means, including operation of the law
enforcement officer's siren or emergency lights, identified himself
or herself and ordered the person to stop;
commits resisting law enforcement, a Class A misdemeanor, except as
provided in subsection (c).
(b) A person who, having been denied entry by a firefighter, an
emergency medical services provider, or a law enforcement officer,
knowingly or intentionally enters an area that is marked off with barrier
tape or other physical barriers, commits interfering with public safety,
HEA 1056

2
a Class B misdemeanor, except as provided in subsection (c) or (k). (j).
(c) The offense under subsection (a) or (b) is a:
(1) Level 6 felony if (A) the person uses a vehicle to commit the
offense; or
(B) (2) Level 5 felony if: while committing the offense, the person:
(i) (A) while committing the offense, the person draws or uses
a deadly weapon;
(ii) (B) while committing the offense, the person inflicts
moderate bodily injury on or otherwise causes moderate
bodily injury to another person; or
(iii) (C) while committing the offense, the person operates a
vehicle in a manner that creates a substantial risk of bodily
injury to another person;
(2) (3) Level 5 Level 4 felony if:
(A) while committing the offense, the person operates a
vehicle in a manner that causes serious bodily injury to another
person; or
(B) the person uses a vehicle to commit the offense and the
person has a prior unrelated conviction under this section
involving the use of a vehicle in the commission of the
offense;
(3) (4) Level 3 felony if, while committing the offense, the person
operates a vehicle in a manner that causes the death or
catastrophic injury of another person; and
(4) (5) Level 2 felony if, while committing any offense described
in subsection (a), the person operates a vehicle in a manner that
causes the death or catastrophic injury of a firefighter, an
emergency medical services provider, or a law enforcement
officer while the firefighter, emergency medical services provider,
or law enforcement officer is engaged in the firefighter's,
emergency medical services provider's, or officer's official duties.
(d) The offense under subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if, while
committing an offense under:
(1) subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2), the person:
(A) creates a substantial risk of bodily injury to the person or
another person; and
(B) has two (2) or more prior unrelated convictions under
subsection (a); or
(2) subsection (a)(3), the person has two (2) or more prior
unrelated convictions under subsection (a).
(e) If a person uses a vehicle to commit a felony offense under
subsection (c)(1)(B), (c)(2), (c)(3), or (c)(4), (c), as part of the criminal
HEA 1056

3
penalty imposed for the offense, the court shall impose a minimum
executed sentence of at least:
(1) thirty (30) days, if the person does not have a prior unrelated
conviction under this section;
(2) one hundred eighty (180) days, if the person has one (1) prior
unrelated conviction under this section; or
(3) one (1) year, if the person has two (2) or more prior unrelated
convictions under this section.
(f) Notwithstanding IC 35-50-2-2.2 and IC 35-50-3-1, the mandatory
minimum sentence imposed under subsection (e) may not be
suspended.
(g) If a person is convicted of an offense involving the use of a
motor vehicle under:
(1) subsection (c)(1)(A), subsection (c)(1), if the person exceeded
the speed limit by at least twenty (20) miles per hour while
committing the offense;
(2) subsection (c)(2); or
(3) subsection (c)(3);
(4) subsection (c)(4); or
(5) subsection (c)(5);
the court may notify the bureau of motor vehicles to suspend or revoke
the person's driver's license in accordance with IC 9-30-4-6.1(b) for the
period described in IC 9-30-4-6.1(d)(1) or IC 9-30-4-6.1(d)(2). The
court shall inform the bureau whether the person has been sentenced
to a term of incarceration. At the time of conviction, the court may
obtain the person's current driver's license and return the license to the
bureau of motor vehicles.
(h) A person may not be charged or convicted of a crime under
subsection (a)(3) if the law enforcement officer is a school resource
officer acting in the officer's capacity as a school resource officer.
(i) (h) A person who commits an offense described in subsection (c)
commits a separate offense for each person whose bodily injury,
serious bodily injury, catastrophic injury, or death is caused by a
violation of subsection (c).
(j) (i) A court may order terms of imprisonment imposed on a
person convicted of more than one (1) offense described in subsection
(c) to run consecutively. Consecutive terms of imprisonment imposed
under this subsection are not subject to the sentencing restrictions set
forth in IC 35-50-1-2(c) through IC 35-50-1-2(d).
(k) (j) As used in this subsection, "family member" means a child,
grandchild, parent, grandparent, or spouse of the person. It is a defense
to a prosecution under subsection (b) that the person reasonably
HEA 1056

4
believed that the person's family member:
(1) was in the marked off area; and
(2) had suffered bodily injury or was at risk of suffering bodily
injury;
if the person is not charged as a defendant in connection with the
offense, if applicable, that caused the area to be secured by barrier tape
or other physical barriers.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
HEA 1056

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1056